fst/morphology/lexicon.lexc
LEXICON VTI-ae_COND_PL
+1Pl:%>yâhk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl:%>yahk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl:%>yahk%>o VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl:%>yêk%>o VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl:%>twâw%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl:%>ýic%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+X:%>hk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTI-io_ConditionalSuffixes
@D.number.PL@ VTI-io_COND_SG ;
VTI-io_COND_PL ;

LEXICON VTI-io_COND_SG
+1Sg:%>yân%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Sg:%>yan%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg:%>c%>i VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTI-io_COND_PL
+1Pl:%>yâhk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl:%>yahk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl:%>yahk%>o VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl:%>yêk%>o VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl:%>twâw%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl:%>ýic%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+X:%>hk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTI-m_ConditionalSuffixes
@D.number.PL@ VTI-m_COND_SG ;
VTI-m_COND_PL ;

LEXICON VTI-m_COND_SG
+1Sg:%>amân%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Sg:%>aman%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg:%>ahk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTI-m_COND_PL
+1Pl:%>amâhk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl:%>amahk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl:%>amahk%>o VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl:%>amêk%>o VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl:%>ahkwâw%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl:%>amiýic%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+X:%>amihk%>i VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTI_ImperativeSuffixes
@R.infl.VTI-ae@ VTI-ae_ImperativeSuffixes ;
@R.infl.VTI-io@ VTI-io_ImperativeSuffixes ;
@R.infl.VTI-m@ VTI-m_ImperativeSuffixes ;

LEXICON VTI-ae_ImperativeSuffixes
! Immediate
@D.number.PL@+Imm+2Sg:@D.number.PL@0 VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+21Pl:%>tân VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Pl:%>k VERBS_Endlex ;
! Delayed
@D.number.PL@+Del+2Sg:@D.number.PL@%>hkan VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+21Pl:%>hkahk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Pl:%>hkêk VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTI-io_ImperativeSuffixes
! Immediate
@D.number.PL@+Imm+2Sg:@D.number.PL@0 VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+21Pl:%>tân VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Pl:%>k VERBS_Endlex ;
! Delayed
@D.number.PL@+Del+2Sg:@D.number.PL@%>hkan VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+21Pl:%>hkahk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Pl:%>hkêk VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTI-m_ImperativeSuffixes
! Immediate
@D.number.PL@+Imm+2Sg:@D.number.PL@%>a VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+21Pl:%>êtân VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Pl:%>amok VERBS_Endlex ;
! Delayed
@D.number.PL@+Del+2Sg:@D.number.PL@%>amôhkan VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+21Pl:%>amôhkahk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Pl:%>amôhkêk VERBS_Endlex ;

!! VTA derivation and inflection

LEXICON VTA_Derivation
0 VTA_Inflection ;
@P.infl.VAI-ae@+Der/Antip:@P.infl.VAI-ae@%>iwê VAI_Class ;
@P.infl.VAI-io@+Der/Rflx:@P.infl.VAI-io@%>i2so VAI_Class ;
@P.infl.VAI-io@@P.number.PL@+Der/Rcpr:@P.infl.VAI-io@@P.number.PL@%>i2to VAI_Class ;
@D.morf.amaw@@P.morf.amaw@+Der/Bnf:@D.morf.amaw@@P.morf.amaw@%>amaw VTA_Class ;
@P.infl.VAI-ae@+Der/Dtr:@P.infl.VAI-ae@%>i2^T2Ckê VAI_Class ;

LEXICON VTA_Inflection
@R.order.Ind@+Ind:@R.order.Ind@ VTA_IndependentSuffixes ;
@R.order.Cnj@+Cnj:@R.order.Cnj@ VTA_ConjunctSuffixes ;
@R.order.Cond@@D.conjunct.CC@+Cond:@R.order.Cond@@D.conjunct.CC@ VTA_ConditionalSuffixes ;
@R.order.Cond@@R.conjunct.CC@+Cond+Inf:@R.order.Cond@@R.conjunct.CC@ VTA_ConditionalSuffixes ;
@R.order.Imp@+Imp:@R.order.Imp@ VTA_ImperativeSuffixes ;

LEXICON VTA_IndependentSuffixes
@R.person.NI@ VTA_IND_1 ;
@R.person.KI@ VTA_IND_2 ;
@R.person.NULL@ VTA_IND_3 ;

LEXICON VTA_IND_1
@D.number.SG@ VTA_IND_1_PL ;
@D.number.PL@ VTA_IND_1_SG ;

LEXICON VTA_IND_2
@D.number.SG@ VTA_IND_2_PL ;
@D.number.PL@ VTA_IND_2_SG ;

LEXICON VTA_IND_3
@D.number.SG@ VTA_IND_3_PL ;
@D.number.PL@ VTA_IND_3_SG ;

LEXICON VTA_IND_1_SG
+1Sg+3SgO:%>âw VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Sg+3PlO:%>âwak VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Sg+4Sg/PlO:%>i2mâwa VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTA_IND_1_PL
+3Sg+1SgO:%>i2k VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg+1PlO:%>i2konân VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Pl+3SgO:%>ânân VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Pl+3PlO:%>ânânak VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2mânâna VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl+1SgO:%>i2kwak VERBS_Endlex ; !
+3Pl+1SgO+Dial:%>i2kowak VERBS_Endlex ; !
+3Pl+1PlO:%>i2konânak VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+1PlO:%>i2konâna VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+1SgO:%>i2koýiwa VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTA_IND_2_SG
+1Sg+2SgO:%>i2tin VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Sg+2PlO:%>i2tinâwâw VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Sg+1SgO:%>in VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Sg+1PlO:%>inân VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Sg+3SgO:%>âw VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Sg+3PlO:%>âwak VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Sg+4Sg/PlO:%>i2mâwa VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTA_IND_2_PL
+3Sg+2SgO:%>i2k VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg+21PlO:%>i2konaw VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg+2PlO:%>i2kowâw VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Pl+2SgO:%>i2tinân VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Pl+2PlO:%>i2tinân VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl+3SgO:%>ânaw VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl+3PlO:%>ânawak VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2mânawa VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl+1SgO:%>inâwâw VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl+3SgO:%>âwâw VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl+1PlO:%>inân VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl+3PlO:%>âwâwak VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2mâwâwa VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl+2SgO:%>i2kwak VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl+2SgO:%>i2kowak VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl+21PlO:%>i2konawak VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl+2PlO:%>i2kowâwak VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+21PlO:%>i2konawa VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+2PlO:%>i2kowâwa VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+2SgO:%>i2koýiwa VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTA_IND_3_SG
+3Sg+4Sg/PlO:%>êw VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg+5Sg/PlO:%>i2mêw VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTA_IND_3_PL
+3Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>êwak VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl+5Sg/PlO:%>i2mêwak VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+3PlO:%>i2kowak VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+3PlO:%>i2kwak VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+3PlO+Dial:%>i2kowak VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+3SgO:%>i2k VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+3SgO+Dial:%>i2kow VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO:%>êýiwa VERBS_Endlex ;
+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2koýiwa VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTA_ConjunctSuffixes
@D.number.SG@ VTA_CNJ_PL ;
@D.number.PL@ VTA_CNJ_SG ;

LEXICON VTA_CNJ_SG
! 1Sg ->
+1Sg+2SgO:%>i2tân VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Sg+2PlO:%>i2takok VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Sg+3SgO:%>ak VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Sg+3PlO:%>akik VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Sg+4Sg/PlO:%>i2mak VERBS_Endlex ;
! 2Sg ->
+2Sg+1SgO:%>iyan VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Sg+3SgO:%>at VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Sg+1PlO:%>iyâhk VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Sg+3PlO:%>acik VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Sg+4Sg/PlO:%>i2mat VERBS_Endlex ;
! 3Sg ->
+3Sg+1SgO:%>it VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg+2SgO:%>i2sk VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg+1PlO:%>i2koyâhk VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg+21PlO:%>i2koyahk VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg+2PlO:%>i2koyêk VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg+4Sg/PlO:%>ât VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg+5Sg/PlO:%>i2mât VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTA_CNJ_PL
! 1Pl ->
+1Pl+2SgO:%>i2tâhk VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Pl+3SgO:%>âyâhk VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Pl+2PlO:%>i2tâhk VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Pl+3PlO:%>âyâhkik VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2mâyâhk VERBS_Endlex ;
! 21Pl ->
+21Pl+3SgO:%>âyahk VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl+3PlO:%>âyahkok VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2mâyahk VERBS_Endlex ;
! 2Pl ->
+2Pl+1SgO:%>iyêk VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl+3SgO:%>âyêk VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl+1PlO:%>iyâhk VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl+3PlO:%>âyêkok VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2mâyêk VERBS_Endlex ;
! 3Pl ->
+3Pl+1SgO:%>icik VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl+2SgO:%>i2skik VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl+1PlO:%>i2koyâhkik VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl+21PlO:%>i2koyahkok VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl+2PlO:%>i2koyêkok VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>âcik VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl+5Sg/PlO:%>i2mâcik VERBS_Endlex ;
! 4Sg/Pl ->
+4Sg/Pl+1SgO:%>i2mit VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+2SgO:%>i2misk VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+3SgO:%>i2kot VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+1PlO:%>i2koyâhk VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+21PlO:%>i2koyahk VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+2PlO:%>i2koyêk VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+3PlO:%>i2kocik VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO:%>âýit VERBS_Endlex ;
! 5Sg/Pl ->
+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2koýit VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTA_ConditionalSuffixes
@D.number.SG@ VTA_COND_PL ;
@D.number.PL@ VTA_COND_SG ;

LEXICON VTA_COND_SG
! 1Sg ->
+1Sg+2SgO:%>i2tâni VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Sg+3SgO:%>aki VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Sg+2PlO:%>i2tako VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Sg+3PlO:%>akwâwi VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Sg+4Sg/PlO:%>i2maki VERBS_Endlex ;
! 2Sg ->
+2Sg+1SgO:%>iyani VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Sg+3SgO:%>aci VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Sg+1PlO:%>iyâhki VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Sg+3PlO:%>atwâwi VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Sg+4Sg/PlO:%>i2maci VERBS_Endlex ;
! 3Sg ->
+3Sg+1SgO:%>ici VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg+2SgO:%>i2ski VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg+1PlO:%>i2koyâhki VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg+21PlO:%>i2koyahki VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg+21PlO:%>i2koyahko VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg+2PlO:%>i2koyêko VERBS_Endlex ; 
+3Sg+4Sg/PlO:%>âci VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Sg+5Sg/PlO:%>i2mâci VERBS_Endlex ; ! From NS 152

LEXICON VTA_COND_PL
! 1Pl ->
+1Pl+2SgO:%>i2tâhki VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Pl+3SgO:%>âyâhki VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Pl+2PlO:%>i2tâhki VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Pl+3PlO:%>âyâhkwâwi VERBS_Endlex ;
+1Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2mâyâhki VERBS_Endlex ;
! 21Pl ->
+21Pl+3SgO:%>âyahki VERBS_Endlex ; ! Variant in Alberta
+21Pl+3SgO:%>âyahko VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl+3PlO:%>âyahkwâwi VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2mâyahki VERBS_Endlex ;
+21Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2mâyahko VERBS_Endlex ;
! 2Pl ->
+2Pl+1SgO:%>iyêko VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl+3SgO:%>âyêko VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl+1PlO:%>iyâhki VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl+3PlO:%>âyêkwâwi VERBS_Endlex ;
+2Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2mâyêko VERBS_Endlex ;
! 3Pl ->
+3Pl+1SgO:%>itwâwi VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl+2SgO:%>i2skwâwi VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl+1PlO:%>i2koyâhkwâwi VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl+21PlO:%>i2koyahkwâwi VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl+2PlO:%>i2koyêkwâwi VERBS_Endlex ;
+3Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>âtwâwi VERBS_Endlex ; ! From NS 152
+3Pl+5Sg/PlO:%>i2mâtwâwi VERBS_Endlex ; ! From NS 152
! 4Sg/Pl ->
+4Sg/Pl+1SgO:%>i2mici VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+2SgO:%>i2miski VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+3SgO:%>i2koci VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+1PlO:%>i2koyâhki VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+21PlO:%>i2koyahki VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+21PlO:%>i2koyahko VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+2PlO:%>i2koyêko VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+3PlO:%>i2kotwâwi VERBS_Endlex ;
+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO:%>âýici VERBS_Endlex ; ! From NS 152
! 5Sg/Pl ->
+5Sg/Pl+4Sg/PlO:%>i2koýici VERBS_Endlex ;
! X ->
+X+1SgO:%>i2kawiyâni VERBS_Endlex ;
+X+2SgO:%>i2kawiyani VERBS_Endlex ;
+X+3SgO:%>i2hci VERBS_Endlex ;
+X+1PlO:%>i2kawiyâhki VERBS_Endlex ;
+X+21PlO:%>i2kawiyahki VERBS_Endlex ;
+X+2PlO:%>i2kawiyêko VERBS_Endlex ;
+X+3PlO:%>i2htwâwi VERBS_Endlex ;
+X+4Sg/PlO:%>i2mihci VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTA_ImperativeSuffixes
@R.infl.VTA@ VTA_IMP ;
@R.infl.VTA-t@ VTA-t_IMP ;
@R.infl.VTA-i@ VTA-i_IMP ;

LEXICON VTA_IMP
@D.number.PL@ VTA_IMP_SG ;
@D.number.SG@ VTA_IMP_PL ;

LEXICON VTA_IMP_SG
! Immediate
! 2Sg ->
+Imm+2Sg+1SgO:%>in VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Sg+3SgO:%>0 VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Sg+1PlO:%>inân VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Sg+3PlO:%>ik VERBS_Endlex ;
! Delayed
! 2Sg ->
+Del+2Sg+1SgO:%>ii2hkan VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Sg+3SgO:%>âhkan VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Sg+1PlO:%>ii2hkâhk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Sg+3PlO:%>âhkanik VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTA_IMP_PL
! Immediate
! 21 ->
+Imm+21Pl+3SgO:%>âtân VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+21Pl+3PlO:%>âtânik VERBS_Endlex ;
! 2Pl ->
+Imm+2Pl+1SgO:%>ik VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Pl+3SgO:%>ihk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Pl+1PlO:%>inân VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Pl+3PlO:%>ihkik VERBS_Endlex ;
! Delayed
! 21 ->
+Del+21Pl+3SgO:%>âhkahk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+21Pl+3PlO:%>âhkahkok VERBS_Endlex ;
! 2Pl ->
+Del+2Pl+1SgO:%>ii2hkêk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Pl+3SgO:%>âhkêk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Pl+1PlO:%>ii2hkâhk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Pl+3PlO:%>âhkêkok VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTA-t_IMP
@D.number.PL@ VTA-t_IMP_SG ;
@D.number.SG@ VTA-t_IMP_PL ;

LEXICON VTA-t_IMP_SG
! Immediate
! 2Sg ->
+Imm+2Sg+1SgO:%>in VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Sg+3SgO:0 VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Sg+1PlO:%>inân VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Sg+3PlO:%>ik VERBS_Endlex ;
! Delayed
! 2Sg ->
+Del+2Sg+3SgO:%>âhkan VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Sg+1SgO:%>ii2hkan VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Sg+1PlO:%>ii2hkâhk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Sg+3PlO:%>âhkanik VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTA-t_IMP_PL
! Immediate
! 21 ->
+Imm+21Pl+3SgO:%>âtân VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+21Pl+3PlO:%>âtânik VERBS_Endlex ;
! 2Pl ->
+Imm+2Pl+1SgO:%>ik VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Pl+3SgO:%>i2hk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Pl+1PlO:%>inân VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Pl+3PlO:%>i2hkik VERBS_Endlex ;
! Delayed
! 21 ->
+Del+21Pl+3SgO:%>âhkahk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+21Pl+3PlO:%>âhkahkok VERBS_Endlex ;
! 2Pl ->
+Del+2Pl+1SgO:%>ii2hkêk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Pl+3SgO:%>âhkêk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Pl+1PlO:%>ii2hkâhk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Pl+3PlO:%>âhkêkok VERBS_Endlex ;

LEXICON VTA-i_IMP
@D.number.PL@ VTA-i_IMP_SG ;
@D.number.SG@ VTA-i_IMP_PL ;

LEXICON VTA-i_IMP_SG
! Immediate
! 2Sg ->
+Imm+2Sg+1SgO:%>in VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Sg+3SgO:%>i VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Sg+1PlO:%>inân VERBS_Endlex ;
+Imm+2Sg+3PlO:%>ik VERBS_Endlex ;
! Delayed
! 2Sg ->
+Del+2Sg+1SgO:%>ii2hkan VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Sg+3SgO:%>âhkan VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Sg+1PlO:%>ii2hkâhk VERBS_Endlex ;
+Del+2Sg+3PlO:%>âhkanik VERBS_Endlex ;
